Louisiana, session 2026, SB172.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:113(A) and (B) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§113. Procedure; legal effect of approval of plat
A. A planning commission shall approve or disapprove a plat within sixty
days after the submission thereof to it; otherwise such the plat shall be deemed to
have been approved, and a certificate to that effect shall be issued by such the
commission on demand. The applicant for a commission's approval may, however,
waive this requirement and consent to an extension of such the period. The ground
of disapproval of any plat shall be stated upon the records of such the commission.
Any plat submitted to such the commission shall contain the name and address of a
person to whom notice of a hearing shall be sent; and no plat shall be acted on by
such the commission without affording a hearing thereon. Notice shall be sent to the
said address by certified mail of the time and place of such the hearing not less than
five days before the date fixed therefor. A planning commission shall give notice of
such the hearings, including the purpose, time, and place, by at least one publication
in a newspaper of general circulation in the area surrounding the proposed
subdivision, not less than five days prior to the hearing date; provided, however, that
in parishes or municipalities with a population in excess of one hundred fifty
thousand, the public hearing may be waived by the planning commission or planning
authority for subdivisions creating five or less lots not involving the creation of any
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 172 ENROLLED
new streets, and provided further that the provisions in such the waivers shall be
clearly set forth in the official subdivision regulations. Every plat approved by a
planning commission shall, by virtue of such the approval, be deemed to be an
amendment of or an addition to or a detail of the official plan and a part thereof.
Approval of a plat shall not be deemed to constitute or effect an acceptance by the
public of any street or other open space shown upon the plat. A planning commission
may, from time to time, recommend to the local legislative body amendments to the
zoning ordinance or map or additions thereto to conform to such the commission's
recommendations for the zoning regulation of the territory comprised within
approved subdivisions.
B. In the case of a parish planning commission, such the requirements or
restrictions shall be stated upon the plat prior to the approval and recording thereof
and shall have the same force of law and be enforceable in the same manner and with
the same sanctions and penalties and subject to the same power of amendment or
repeal as though set out as a part of a zoning ordinance or map.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.